Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 945 of Title 74, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any state or education employee who is a member of the


Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement System, Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System, Teachers’ Retirement System of


Oklahoma, or The Uniform Retirement System for Justices and Judges


and who is charged with a felony in a state or federal court of


competent jurisdiction shall lose the right to access, withdraw


from, or liquidate the retirement benefit of the member.



Req. No. 3546 Page 1


B. The prosecuting attorney shall notify the retirement system


that the employee is a member within forty-eight (48) hours of the


filed charge. Upon notification, the system shall immediately


implement the requirements of this section.


C. Any claims for payment to a member upon being charged with a


felony shall be rejected by the system pursuant to this section.


D. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit access


to retirement benefits by a member who is found not guilty in a


state or federal court of competent jurisdiction.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3546 BRC 1/14/2026 8:19:39 PM

























Req. No. 3546 Page 2